Nevada, session 83, AB201-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 433 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Department shall:
(a) Track the spending of federal and state money on the
children’s behavioral health system of care;
(b) Quantify and track the costs avoided through the
expenditures described in paragraph (a) over time;
(c) Solicit, compile and analyze information and hold public
hearings concerning:
(1) The use of federal and state money spent on the
children’s behavioral health system of care; and
(2) Ways to reinvest the money saved through the avoided
costs quantified pursuant to paragraph (b) in the children’s
behavioral health system of care in a manner that addresses the
behavioral health needs of children in this State and reduces the
involvement of such children in the child welfare and juvenile
justice systems;
(d) On or before June 30 of every even-numbered year, present
at a meeting of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health
and Human Services concerning:
(1) The costs that are projected to be avoided through the
expenditure of federal and state money on the children’s
behavioral health system of care during the immediately following
2 years; and
(2) Recommendations for the reinvestment of such avoided
costs in accordance with subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c); and
(e) On or before December 31 of every even-numbered year,
submit a report of the information described in paragraph (d) to
the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmittal to the Senate Standing Committee on Finance and
the Assembly Standing Committee on Ways and Means at the
beginning of the next regular session of the Legislature.
2. For the purposes of this section, the children’s behavioral
health system of care consists of:
(a) Respite care for families and caregivers;
(b) Community-based and in-home behavioral health services
for children;
(c) Services for children in a behavioral health crisis,
including, without limitation, mobile crisis services and services
for in-home stabilization;
-
*AB201_R2*

– 4 –
(d) Services to promote the coordination of behavioral health
care between families and providers, including, without limitation,
high fidelity wraparound;
(e) Family-to-family peer support services;
(f) Specialty services for children with an emotional
disturbance and dual diagnoses;
(g) Behavioral health services identified in the state plan for
foster care and adoption assistance established pursuant to 42
U.S.C. § 671; and
(h) Any other services prescribed by regulation of the Division
of Child and Family Services of the Department.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child with an emotional disturbance” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 433B.045.
(b) “High fidelity wraparound” means an evidence-based,
structured and team-oriented process for developing and
implementing a plan to meet all of the behavioral health needs of
a child with complex behavioral health issues in collaboration
with the family of the child.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. NRS 433.317 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.317 1. The Commission shall appoint a subcommittee on
the mental health of children to review the findings and
recommendations of each mental health consortium submitted
pursuant to NRS 433B.335 and to create a statewide plan for the
provision of mental health services to children. The members of the
subcommittee must include, without limitation, two members
recommended by and upon agreement of the mental health
consortia established pursuant to NRS 433B.333.
2. The members of the subcommittee appointed pursuant to
this section serve at the pleasure of the Commission. The members
serve without compensation, except that each member is entitled,
while engaged in the business of the subcommittee, to the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally if funding is available for this purpose.
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. NRS 433.4295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.4295 1. Each policy board shall:
(a) Advise the Department, the Division , the Division of Child
and Family Services and the Commission , as appropriate,
regarding:
(1) The behavioral health needs of adults and children in the
behavioral health region;
-
*AB201_R2*

– 5 –
(2) Any progress, problems or proposed plans relating to the
provision of behavioral health services and methods to improve the
provision of behavioral health services in the behavioral health
region;
(3) Identified gaps in the behavioral health services which
are available in the behavioral health region and any
recommendations or service enhancements to address those gaps;
(4) Any federal, state or local law or regulation that relates to
behavioral health which it determines is redundant, conflicts with
other laws or is obsolete and any recommendation to address any
such redundant, conflicting or obsolete law or regulation; and
(5) Priorities for allocating money to support and develop
behavioral health services in the behavioral health region.
(b) Promote improvements in the delivery of behavioral health
services in the behavioral health region.
(c) Coordinate and exchange information with the other policy
boards to provide unified and coordinated recommendations to the
Department, the Division , the Division of Child and Family
Services and the Commission regarding behavioral health services
in the behavioral health region.
(d) Review the collection and reporting standards of behavioral
health data to determine standards for such data collection and
reporting processes.
(e) To the extent feasible, establish an organized, sustainable
and accurate electronic repository of data and information
concerning behavioral health and behavioral health services in the
behavioral health region that is accessible to members of the public
on an Internet website maintained by the policy board. A policy
board may collaborate with an existing community-based
organization to establish the repository.
(f) To the extent feasible, track and compile data concerning
persons placed on a mental health crisis hold pursuant to NRS
433A.160, persons admitted to mental health facilities and hospitals
under an emergency admission pursuant to NRS 433A.162, persons
admitted to mental health facilities under an involuntary court-
ordered admission pursuant to NRS 433A.200 to 433A.330,
inclusive, and persons ordered to receive assisted outpatient
treatment pursuant to NRS 433A.335 to 433A.345, inclusive, in the
behavioral health region, including, without limitation:
(1) The outcomes of treatment provided to such persons; and
(2) Measures taken upon and after the release of such
persons to address behavioral health issues and prevent future
mental health crisis holds and admissions.
(g) If a data dashboard is established pursuant to NRS 439.245,
use the data dashboard to review access by different groups and
-
*AB201_R2*

– 6 –
populations in this State to behavioral health services provided
through telehealth, as defined in NRS 629.515, and evaluate policies
to make such access more equitable.
(h) Identify and coordinate with other entities in the behavioral
health region and this State that address issues relating to behavioral
health to increase awareness of such issues and avoid duplication of
efforts.
(i) In coordination with existing entities in this State that address
issues relating to behavioral health services, submit an annual report
to the Commission , the Division and the Division of Child and
Family Services which includes, without limitation:
(1) The specific behavioral health needs of the behavioral
health region;
(2) A description of the methods used by the policy board to
collect and analyze data concerning the behavioral health needs and
problems of the behavioral health region and gaps in behavioral
health services which are available in the behavioral health region,
including, without limitation, a list of all sources of such data used
by the policy board;
(3) A description of the manner in which the policy board
has carried out the requirements of paragraphs (c) and (h) and the
results of those activities; and
(4) The data compiled pursuant to paragraph (f) and any
conclusions that the policy board has derived from such data.
2. A report described in paragraph (i) of subsection 1 may be
submitted more often than annually if the policy board determines
that a specific behavioral health issue requires an additional report .
[to the Commission.]
3. As used in this section, “Division of Child and Family
Services” means the Division of Child and Family Services of the
Department.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. NRS 433B.335 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433B.335 1. Each mental health consortium established
pursuant to NRS 433B.333 shall prepare and submit to the Director
of the Department and the Administrator a long-term strategic plan
for the provision of mental health services to children with
emotional disturbance in the jurisdiction of the consortium. A plan
submitted pursuant to this section is valid for 10 years after the date
of submission, and each consortium shall submit a new plan upon its
expiration.
-
*AB201_R2*

– 7 –
2. In preparing the long-term strategic plan pursuant to
subsection 1, each mental health consortium must be guided by the
following principles:
(a) The system of mental health services set forth in the plan
should be centered on children with emotional disturbance and their
families, with the needs and strengths of those children and their
families dictating the types and mix of services provided.
(b) The families of children with emotional disturbance,
including, without limitation, foster parents, should be active
participants in all aspects of planning, selecting and delivering
mental health services at the local level.
(c) The system of mental health services should be community-
based and flexible, with accountability and the focus of the services
at the local level.
(d) The system of mental health services should provide timely
access to a comprehensive array of cost-effective mental health
services.
(e) Children and their families who are in need of mental health
services should be identified as early as possible through screening,
assessment processes, treatment and systems of support.
(f) Comprehensive mental health services should be made
available in the least restrictive but clinically appropriate
environment.
(g) The family of a child with an emotional disturbance should
be eligible to receive mental health services from the system.
(h) Mental health services should be provided to children with
emotional disturbance in a sensitive manner that is responsive to
cultural and gender-based differences and the special needs of the
children.
3. The long-term strategic plan prepared pursuant to subsection
1 must include:
(a) An assessment of the need for mental health services in the
jurisdiction of the consortium;
(b) The long-term strategies and goals of the consortium for
providing mental health services to children with emotional
disturbance within the jurisdiction of the consortium;
(c) A description of the types of services to be offered to
children with emotional disturbance within the jurisdiction of the
consortium;
(d) Criteria for eligibility for those services;
(e) A description of the manner in which those services may be
obtained by eligible children;
(f) The manner in which the costs for those services will be
allocated;
-
*AB201_R2*

– 8 –
(g) The mechanisms to manage the money provided for those
services;
(h) Documentation of the number of children with emotional
disturbance who are not currently being provided services, the costs
to provide services to those children, the obstacles to providing
services to those children and recommendations for removing those
obstacles;
(i) Methods for obtaining additional money and services for
children with emotional disturbance from private and public entities;
and
(j) The manner in which family members of eligible children
and other persons may be involved in the treatment of the children.
4. On or before January 31 of each even-numbered year, each
mental health consortium shall submit to the Director of the
Department , the Administrator and the Commission:
(a) A list of the priorities of services necessary to implement the
long-term strategic plan submitted pursuant to subsection 1 and an
itemized list of the costs to provide those services;
(b) A description of any revisions to the long-term strategic plan
adopted by the consortium during the immediately preceding year;
and
(c) Any request for an allocation for administrative expenses of
the consortium.
5. In preparing the biennial budget request for the Department,
the Director of the Department shall consider the list of priorities
and any request for an allocation submitted pursuant to subsection 4
by each mental health consortium. On or before September 30 of
each even-numbered year, the Director of the Department shall
submit to each mental health consortium a report which includes a
description of:
(a) Each item on the list of priorities of the consortium that was
included in the biennial budget request for the Department;
(b) Each item on the list of priorities of the consortium that was
not included in the biennial budget request for the Department and
an explanation for the exclusion; and
(c) Any request for an allocation for administrative expenses of
the consortium that was included in the biennial budget request for
the Department.
6. On or before January 31 of each odd-numbered year, each
consortium shall submit to the Director of the Department , the
Administrator and the Commission:
(a) A report regarding the status of the long-term strategic plan
submitted pursuant to subsection 1, including, without limitation,
the status of the strategies, goals and services included in the plan;
-
*AB201_R2*

– 9 –
(b) A description of any revisions to the long-term strategic plan
adopted by the consortium during the immediately preceding year;
and
(c) A report of all expenditures made from an account
maintained pursuant to NRS 433B.339, if any.
Sec. 11.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12.8. NRS 449.0303 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
449.0303 The Board may adopt regulations requiring the
licensing of a facility other than those required to be licensed
pursuant to NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, if the:
1. Facility provides any type of medical care or treatment [;] ,
including, without limitation, behavioral health care or treatment;
and
2. Regulation is necessary to protect the health of the general
public.
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13.5. 1. During the 2023-2024 interim, the Legislative
Committee on Senior Citizens, Veterans and Adults With Special
Needs created by NRS 218E.750 shall study the feasibility of
formulating and operating a comprehensive plan to provide
behavioral health services in this State. In conducting the study, the
Committee may collaborate with:
(a) The Commission on Behavioral Health;
(b) Personnel of the Department of Health and Human Services
or any division thereof;
(c) Any regional behavioral health policy board created by NRS
433.429; and
(d) Any other state or local governmental entity that provides or
performs duties relating to behavioral health services in this State.
2. On or before September 1, 2024, the Legislative Committee
on Senior Citizens, Veterans and Adults With Special Needs shall
submit a report of the results of the study conducted pursuant to
subsection 1 and recommendations for legislation resulting from the
study to:
(a) The Governor; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 83rd Session of the Nevada Legislature.
Sec. 14. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
-
*AB201_R2*

– 10 –
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*AB201_R2*